Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 5. Powers of Attorney.
demand, receive, or obtain money or any other thing of value to which the principal is or may become or may claim to be entitled as remuneration for services performed, or as a stock dividend or distribution, or as interest or principal upon indebtedness, or as a periodic distribution of profits from any partnership or business in which the principal has or claims an interest, and endorse, collect, or otherwise realize upon an instrument for the payment received;

prepare, execute, and file all tax, social security, unemployment insurance, and information returns required by the laws of the United States or of any state or subdivision, or of any foreign government; prepare, execute, and file all other papers and instruments that the agent considers desirable or necessary for the safeguarding of the principal against excess or illegal taxation or against penalties imposed for claimed violation of a law or regulation; and pay, compromise, or contest or apply for refunds in connection with a tax or assessment for which the principal is or may be liable;

use an asset of the principal to perform a power enumerated in this subsection, including by way of illustration and not by way of restriction, power to draw money by check or otherwise from a bank deposit of the principal, to sell land or a chattel, bond, share, commodity interest, or other asset of the principal, to borrow money, and to pledge as security for the loan any asset, including insurance, that belongs to the principal;

execute, acknowledge, verify, seal, file, and deliver an application, consent, petition, notice, release, waiver, agreement, or other instrument that the agent considers useful to accomplish a purpose enumerated in this subsection;

prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to a claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving a transaction enumerated in this subsection, or intervene in any action or proceeding related to a transaction;

hire, discharge, and compensate an attorney, accountant, expert witness, or assistant when the agent considers the action to be desirable for the proper execution of any of the powers described in this subsection, and for the keeping of records, about that action;

do any other act or acts that the principal can do through an agent, for the welfare of the spouse, children, or dependents of the principal or for the preservation and maintenance of the other personal relationships of the principal to a parent, relative, friend, or organization; and

act as the principal’s personal representative under 42 U.S.C. 1320d (Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and secs. 1171 — 1179, Social Security Act), as amended, and applicable regulations, in making decisions related to the past, present, or future payment for the provision of health care consented to by the principal or anyone authorized under the law of this state to consent to health care on behalf of the principal.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to benefits from government programs or civil or military service shall be construed to mean that, whether the benefits from the government programs or civil or military service have accrued to the principal in the state or elsewhere, the principal authorizes the agent to

prepare and execute vouchers, applications, requests, forms, and other legal documents in the name of the principal for all benefits, bonuses, dividends, allowances, and reimbursements payable under any government program or military service of the United States, a state, or a subdivision, including allowances and reimbursements for transportation of the individuals described in (j)(1) of this section, and for shipment of their household effects, and receive, endorse, and collect the proceeds of a check payable to the order of the principal drawn on the treasurer or other fiscal officer or depositary of the United States, a state, or a subdivision;

take possession and order the removal and shipment of property of the principal from any post, warehouse, depot, dock, or other place or storage or safekeeping and execute and deliver any release, voucher, receipt, bill of lading, shipping ticket, certificate, or other instrument that the agent considers desirable or necessary for that purpose;

prepare, file, and prosecute the claim of the principal to any benefit or assistance to which the principal is, or claims to be, entitled under the provisions of a statute or regulation of the United States, a state, or a subdivision;

receive the financial proceeds of a claim of the type described in this subsection; conserve, invest, disburse or use anything received for purposes enumerated in this subsection; and reimburse the agent for expenditures properly made in the execution of the powers conferred by the statutory form power of attorney;

prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to a claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving a benefit from a government program or military service, or intervene in an action relating to a claim;

hire, discharge, or compensate an attorney, accountant, expert witness, or assistant when the agent considers that action to be desirable for the proper execution of any of the powers described in this subsection;

enroll in, apply for, select, reject, change, amend, or discontinue, on the principal’s behalf, a benefit or program; and

do any other act or acts that the principal can do through an agent, and that the agent considers desirable or necessary to assure to the principal and to the dependents of the principal the maximum possible benefit from the government programs or civil or military service of the United States, a state, or a subdivision.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 83 SLA 2004.]

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to records, reports, and statements shall be construed to mean that, with respect to a record, report, or statement concerning the affairs of the principal, whether arising in the state or elsewhere, the principal authorizes the agent to

keep records of cash received and disbursed for or on account of the principal, of all credits and debits to the account of the principal, and of all transactions affecting the assets and liabilities of the principal;

prepare, execute, and file all tax, social security, unemployment insurance, and information returns required by the laws of the United States, a state, or a subdivision, or of any foreign government, and prepare, execute, and file all other papers and instruments that the agent considers desirable or necessary for the safeguarding of the principal against excess or illegal taxation or against penalties imposed for claimed violation of a law or regulation;

prepare, execute, and file a record, report, or statement that the agent considers desirable or necessary for the safeguarding or maintenance of the principal’s interest with respect to price, rent, wage, or rationing control, or any other governmental activity;

hire, discharge, or compensate an attorney, accountant, or assistant when the agent reasonably believes the action to be desirable for the proper execution of the powers described in this subsection; and

do any other act or acts that the principal can do through an agent in connection with the preparation, execution, filing, storage, or other use of any records, reports, or statements of or concerning the principal’s affairs.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 50 SLA 2016.]

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to all other matters shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the person designated in the power of attorney to act as an agent of the principal with respect to

matters specifically described as other matters in the statutory form power of attorney; and

any other matter that is not enumerated in or excluded by this section and that the principal can lawfully do through an agent.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with regard to voter registration and absentee ballot requests shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the agent to register the principal to vote or request an absentee ballot for the principal.

In a statutory form power of attorney, unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, the language conferring specific authority with respect to gift transactions shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the agent only

to make a gift of the principal’s property only as the agent determines is consistent with the principal’s objectives if actually known by the agent and, if unknown, as the agent determines is consistent with the principal’s best interest based on all relevant factors, including

the value and nature of the principal’s property;

the principal’s foreseeable obligations and need for maintenance;

minimization of taxes, including income, estate, inheritance, generation-skipping transfer, and gift taxes;

eligibility for a benefit, a program, or assistance under a statute or regulation; and

the principal’s personal history of making or joining in making gifts;

subject to (1) of this subsection, to make outright to, or for the benefit of, a person, a gift of any of the principal’s property, including by the exercise of a presently exercisable general power of appointment held by the principal, in an amount for each donee not to exceed the annual dollar limits of the federal gift tax exclusion under 26 U.S.C. 2503(b) (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, without regard to whether the federal gift tax exclusion applies to the gift, or if the principal’s spouse agrees to consent to a split gift under 26 U.S.C. 2513 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, in an amount for each donee not to exceed twice the annual federal gift tax exclusion limit; in this paragraph, “presently exercisable general power of appointment,” with respect to property or a property interest subject to a power of appointment, means power exercisable at the time in question to vest absolute ownership in the principal individually, the principal’s estate, the principal’s creditors, or the creditors of the principal’s estate; the term includes a power of appointment not exercisable until the occurrence of a specified event, the satisfaction of an ascertainable standard, or the passage of a specified period only after the occurrence of the specified event, the satisfaction of the ascertainable standard, or the passage of the specified period; the term does not include a power exercisable in a fiduciary capacity or only by will; and

subject to (1) of this subsection, to consent, under 26 U.S.C. 2513 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, to the splitting of a gift made by the principal’s spouse in an amount for each donee not to exceed the aggregate annual gift tax exclusions for both spouses.

conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything so received for purposes enumerated in this subsection; and reimburse the agent for an expenditure properly made in the execution of the powers conferred by the statutory form power of attorney;

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 1988; am § 14 ch 23 SLA 1995; am § 3 ch 63 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 33 SLA 1999; am § 15 ch 83 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 2 FSSLA 2005; am § 22 ch 56 SLA 2005; am § 10 ch 58 SLA 2010; am §§ 8 — 17, 28 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2014, in subsection (f), the word “or” was inserted in the phrase “in the state or elsewhere” to correct a manifest error in ch. 109, SLA 1988.

Formerly AS 13.26.344; renumbered in 2016 at which time in subsection (j) “AS

13.26.600

—

13.26.695

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.326 — 13.26.359”.

Cross references. —

For authority giving continuing effect to a power of attorney that contains authority for health care services under former paragraph (

l

) in effect on January 1, 2005, until the power of attorney is revoked, see sec. 16(b), ch. 83, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Editor’s notes. —

In subsection (j), the reference to “Sections 1171 — 1179, Social Security Act,” may refer to the provisions of that Act that have been codified at 42 USC 1320d — 1320d-8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a)(2), deleted “revoke, create or modify a trust,” following “consent to the partitioning,”, in (a)(9), deleted “revocation, declaration or modification of trust,” following “deliver a deed”; in (b)(2), deleted “revoke, create, or modify a trust,” following “pawn,”, in (b)(7), deleted “revocation, declaration or modification of trust,” following “conveyance,”; in (c)(2), deleted “revoke, create, or modify a trust,” following “pledge,”, in (c)(9), deleted “revocation, declaration or modification of trust,” following “assignment,”; in (d)(8), inserted “use,” following “guarantee,” and “credit and debit cards, electronic transaction authorizations,” following “drafts”; added (e)(10) – (14), and made related and stylistic changes; added (f)(13) and made related changes; rewrote (h); in (j), inserted “is neither dependent on, nor limited by, authority that an agent may or may not have with respect to gifts under AS 13.26.326 – 13.26.359, and” following “personal relationships”; in (j)(1), inserted “whether living when the power of attorney is executed or later born, and individuals whom the principal has customarily supported or indicated the intent to support,” following “principal,”; inserted “, and to make periodic payments of child support and other family maintenance required by a court or governmental agency or an agreement to which the principal is a party” following “incidentals”; added (j)(15), and made stylistic changes; in the introductory language of (k), substituted “or civil or military service” for “and military service” and “or civil or military service” for “military service”; in (k)(1), inserted “including allowances and reimbursements or transportation of the individuals described in (j)(1) of this section, and for shipment of their household effects,” following “or a subdivision,”, added (k)(7), in (k)(8), inserted “or civil” preceding “or military service”, and made related and stylistic changes; repealed (n); added (q).